Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1604
Errors or omissions; exempt from liability.

The Secretary of State, all county clerks, and their employees or agents shall be exempt from all personal liability as a result of any error or omission in providing information of such statutory liens except in cases of willful misconduct or gross negligence.

Laws 1988, LB 987, § 4.